vi: Định dạng sách điện tử được hỗ trợ: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Khác
ko: 지원되는 전자책 형식: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; 기타
cs: Podporované formáty e-knih: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Jiné
bg-BG: Поддържани формати за електронни книги: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Други
ja: 対応している電子書籍のフォーマット: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; その他
hu: Támogatott e-könyv-formátumok: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Egyéb
zh-TW: 支援的電子書格式: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; 其他
da: Understøttede e-bogformater: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Andet
nb: Støttede e-bokformater: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Annet
ru: Поддерживаемые форматы для электронных книг: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Другой
ro-RO: Formate de cărți electronice acceptate: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Altele
lt-LT: Palaikomi elektroninių knygų formatai: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Kita
pt-PT: Formatos de e-book suportados: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Outro
hr-HR: Podržani formati e-knjiga: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Ostalo
fi: Tuetut e-kirjaformaatit: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Muu
pt-BR: Formatos de e-book compatíveis: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Outro
sk-SK: Podporované formáty elektronických kníh: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Iné
tr: Desteklenen e-kitap formatları: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Diğer
fr: Formats de livres électroniques pris en charge: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Autre
de: Unterstützte E-Book-Formate: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Sonstiges
nl: Ondersteunde eboek-indelingen: Speciaal voor; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Andere
pl: Obsługiwane formaty e-booków: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Inne
en: E-book formats supported: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Other
es: Formatos de libros electrónicos compatibles: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Otros
it: Formati e-book supportati: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Altro
sl-SI: Podprte oblike zapisa e-knjige: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Drugo
sv: Kompatibla e-boksformat: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Övrigt
zh-CN: 支持的电子书格式: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; 其他
el: Υποστηριζόμενες μορφές ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; Άλλο
th: รองรับรูปแบบ E-book: AZW; AZW3; CBZ/CBR; DJVU; DOC/DOCX; EPUB; HTML; MOBI; PDF; RTF; TXT; อื่นๆ